Delaware, session 153, HB247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Notwithstanding Â§ 8601 through Â§ 8604 of Title 9 of the Delaware Code and Chapter 19 of Title 14 of the Delaware Code, the appropriate tax collecting authority for New Castle County (âNew Castle Countyâ) shall offer all taxpayers a payment plan for county property taxes and school taxes assessed to residential properties. For each payment plan, New Castle County must consider the difference in taxes owed between the 2024-2025 tax year and the 2025-2026 tax year. After offering a payment plan, New Castle County must give the taxpayer at least 30 days after the date of the offer to enter into the payment plan. Section 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 87 of Title 9 of the Delaware Code, Â§ 2905 of Title 25 of the Delaware Code, or other State or county law allowing for the collection of taxes, if a taxpayer enters into a payment plan under Section 1 of this Act and makes payments in compliance with the payment plan, New Castle County may not collect the taxes owed out of the taxpayerâs real property or personal property, including by doing any of the following: (1) Filing a civil action. (2) Garnishing the taxpayerâs wages. (3) Seizing the taxpayerâs real or personal property. (4) Issuing a monition. (5) Filing for a writ of venditioni exponas. (6) Instituting attachment proceedings under Subchapter III, Chapter 87 of Title 9 of the Delaware Code. (7) Selling the taxpayerâs real or personal property through a sheriffâs sale or any other legal proceeding. (8) Filing an action to collect on a tax lien. Section 3. Notwithstanding Â§ 8694 of Title 9 of the Delaware Code, of Â§ 1917 of Title 14 of the Delaware Code, or any other State or county law allowing late fees, penalties, or interest to be charged on county or school taxes, if a taxpayer enters into a payment plan under Section 1 of this Act and makes payments in compliance with the payment plan, New Castle County may not charge any fees, penalties, or interest on the taxes due. Section 4. This Act applies to New Castle County residential property and school taxes assessed for the 2025-2026 tax year. Section 5. (1) This Act expires on December 31, 2026, unless otherwise provided by a subsequent action of the General Assembly. (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this section, Section 2 and Section 3 of this Act continue to apply to payment plans that continue on or after December 31, 2026, so long as the taxpayer makes payments in compliance with the payment plan.